Utah statutes.
17-16-16.   Commissioners' traveling expenses.
The members of the board of county commissioners shall not receive any
compensation in addition to that provided in Section 17-16-14 for any special
or committee work, but each member shall be paid the amount of his actual and
reasonable traveling expenses in attending the regular and special sessions of
the board and in the discharge of necessary duties; provided, that an itemized
statement shall be made showing in detail the expenses incurred, and shall be
subscribed and sworn to by the member claiming such expenses.
